California, session 20252026, SB1126.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Under the California Constitution, the people have the right of access to information concerning the conduct of the people’s business. Access to the audited financial statements of local agencies and school districts is a fundamental and necessary right of every resident to ensure the proper stewardship of public funds.(b) Recent instances of fiscal distress and mismanagement in various local jurisdictions have highlighted the need for timely, accessible, and transparent financial reporting. Publicly available audits serve as an “early warning system” for taxpayers, creditors, and state oversight agencies.(c) While existing law requires the performance of annual audits, there is currently no uniform requirement for these documents to be posted prominently online. This lack of standardization creates “transparency deserts,” where residents must navigate complex requests under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) to view basic financial health data.(d) In a modern democracy, “publicly available” must mean “available online.” Requiring local agencies and educational entities to host their audited financial statements on their internet websites ensures that information is accessible to all Californians regardless of their ability to visit a physical government office during business hours.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to provide a simple, no-cost mechanism for the public to monitor the fiscal health of their local governments and to ensure that financial accountability is a proactive duty of the state’s political subdivisions rather than a reactive response to inquiry.SEC. 2.Section 41020.4 is added to the Education Code, to read:41020.4.The governing board or body of each local educational agency shall post the annual audit report required by Section 41020 on the internet website of the local educational agency. All of the following shall apply to the posting:(a)The annual audit report shall be posted in a prominent location on the internet website and be accessible to the public without a password or fee.(b)The annual audit report shall be posted within 30 days of the due date of the audit report required by Section 41020 or the audit report issue date, whichever is later.(c)The local educational agency shall maintain the posted audit report on its internet website for a period of not less than three years.(d)For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, county superintendent of schools, or charter school.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. Article 10.2 (commencing with Section 53905) is added to Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, to read: Article 10.2. Financial Postings53905. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of this section, “local agency” means a city, including a charter city, county, city and county, or an independent special district, as defined in Section 56044.(b) If a local agency maintains an internet website, the local agency shall post its audited financial statements, or its annual comprehensive financial report, on that internet website. All the following apply to the posting:(1) The audited financial statement or annual comprehensive financial report shall be posted in a prominent location on the internet website and be accessible to the public without a password or fee.(2) The audited financial statement or annual comprehensive financial report shall be posted within 30 days of the date that the statements or report are completed by the local agency.(3) The local agency shall maintain the posted audited financial statement or annual comprehensive financial report on its internet website for a period of not less than three years.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that the fiscal integrity of local agencies and school districts is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution, and that the financial failure of a single local entity can have cascading effects on the state’s credit rating, the stability of the public employee retirement systems, and the delivery of essential services like education and public safety. Therefore, Section 3 2 of this act adding Article 10.2 (commencing with Section 53905) to Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.